Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 3. Purposes and Powers.

Purposes for which corporations may be organized under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-149.

Disposition of assets requiring shareholder approval, see § 79-4-12.02.

Corporation cannot surrender franchise with freedom of individual. Southern Electric Sec. Co. v. State, 91 Miss. 195, 44 So. 785, 1907 Miss. LEXIS 136 (Miss. 1907).

Laws 1912, ch. 162, does not affect right of corporation to acquire land for other than agricultural purposes. Middleton v. Georgetown Mercantile Co., 117 Miss. 134, 77 So. 956, 1918 Miss. LEXIS 157 (Miss. 1918).

Under Code 1880 and Laws 1882, p. 50, there is no public policy making a distinction between the rights of foreign and domestic corporations as to ownership of lands in this state; nor does comity authorize such a distinction. Taylor v. Alliance Trust Co., 71 Miss. 694, 15 So. 121, 1893 Miss. LEXIS 81 (Miss. 1893).

A conveyance of the land of an incorporated bank executed by its officers, where the purchase money is paid, passes the equitable title without the use of a corporate seal; whether the complete legal title passes by such a conveyance is not decided. McIver v. Abernathy, 66 Miss. 79, 5 So. 519, 1888 Miss. LEXIS 63 (Miss. 1888).

A stockholder in a corporation is bound by the act of a majority where due notice of a stockholders’ meeting was given him, although he was absent and unrepresented at the meeting. Hinds County v. Natchez J. & C. R. Co., 85 Miss. 599, 38 So. 189, 1904 Miss. LEXIS 111 (Miss. 1904).

Stock of domestic corporation held by foreign corporation cannot be voted except in this state. Southern Electric Sec. Co. v. State, 91 Miss. 195, 44 So. 785, 1907 Miss. LEXIS 136 (Miss. 1907).

Unsealed deed by corporation held not available in ejectment to support plaintiff’s title. Littelle v. Creek Lumber Co., 99 Miss. 241, 54 So. 841, 1911 Miss. LEXIS 199 (Miss. 1911).

Corporation receiving proceeds of purchase of property cannot defeat payment of note for price on ground that general manager had no authority to execute it. Watts Mercantile Co. v. Buchanan, 92 Miss. 540, 46 So. 66, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 204 (Miss. 1908).

Corporation held liable for slander of agent within scope of his employment, though without knowledge, approval, or ratification thereof. Rivers v. Yazoo & M. V. R. Co., 90 Miss. 196, 43 So. 471, 1907 Miss. LEXIS 69 (Miss. 1907).

An insolvent corporation may in good faith prefer a creditor. Ferguson v. Oxford Mercantile Co., 78 Miss. 65, 27 So. 877, 1900 Miss. LEXIS 68 (Miss. 1900).

Estoppel of stockholder to recover back or to secure restoration of compensation of corporate officers claimed to be exorbitant or unauthorized.
16 A.L.R.2d 467.

Expenses incurred by competing factions within corporation in soliciting proxies as charge against corporation. 51 A.L.R.2d 873.

Practice by attorneys and physicians as corporate entities or associations under professional service corporation statutes. 4 A.L.R.3d 383.

Right of corporation to indemnity for civil or criminal liability incurred by employee’s violation of antitrust laws. 37 A.L.R.3d 1355.

Corporation: validity of charter provision for non-voting common stock.
52 A.L.R.3d 1131.

Construction and operation of statute restricting corporation’s right to purchase its own stock to purchase from surplus. 61 A.L.R.3d 1049.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:566 et seq., (board of directors – provision for corporate seal).

The defense of ultra vires cannot prevail against the doctrine of equitable estoppel where action was brought by receivers of an educational corporation seeking a recovery in connection with a completely executed purchase of stock. Pendleton v. Williams, 198 So. 2d 235, 1967 Miss. LEXIS 1255 (Miss. 1967).

Power of corporation or its officers with respect to payment of remuneration, bonus, and the like, to widow or family of deceased father.
29 A.L.R.2d 1262.

Authority of president to subordinate corporation’s claim, assignment, lien, or the like.
53 A.L.R.2d 1421.

Liability of corporate directors or negligence in permitting mismanagement or defalcations by officers or employees.
25 A.L.R.3d 941.

Test in stockholders’ actions as to reasonableness of compensation of corporate officers who as directors determine own compensation.
53 A.L.R.3d 358.

Emergency powers of board of directors of corporation, see § 79-4-3.03.

Corporation’s exceeding or abusing authority conferred upon it by law as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

A constitution adopted by a corporation is in effect a mere bylaw, that may be repealed or modified by resolutions subsequently adopted by the corporation. Dornes v. Supreme Lodge, K. P., 75 Miss. 466, 23 So. 191, 1897 Miss. LEXIS 143 (Miss. 1897).

Rule that corporation’s power to own land in excess of the amount prescribed by its charter cannot be questioned collaterally does not apply where the corporation is seeking aid of the court to enable it to acquire land which it has no power to acquire and hold. Southern Realty Co. v. Tchula Co-operative Stores, 114 Miss. 309, 75 So. 121, 1917 Miss. LEXIS 36 (Miss. 1917).

Unsealed deed of corporation passes the equitable title. Hines v. Imperial Naval Store Co., 101 Miss. 802, 58 So. 650, 1911 Miss. LEXIS 176 (Miss. 1911).

A private corporation doing an unprofitable business may sell its entire assets upon a vote of the majority of its stockholders even in the absence of an express enabling statute. Hinds County v. Natchez J. & C. R. Co., 85 Miss. 599, 38 So. 189, 1904 Miss. LEXIS 111 (Miss. 1904).

Such reduction will not release liability of certain officers and stockholders, to the stockholders, for assets squandered by them. Perry v. Bank of Commerce, 116 Miss. 838, 77 So. 812, 1917 Miss. LEXIS 365 (Miss. 1917).

The legislature may divest a municipality of control over its streets and authorize their use by a corporation without compensating the municipality. Mayor, etc., of Canton v. Canton Cotton Warehouse Co., 84 Miss. 268, 36 So. 266, 1904 Miss. LEXIS 39 (Miss. 1904).

Where a corporation having authority to do so sells its franchise to another corporation, the stockholders of the seller cannot avoid the sale for want of power in the purchaser to buy. Hinds County v. Natchez J. & C. R. Co., 85 Miss. 599, 38 So. 189, 1904 Miss. LEXIS 111 (Miss. 1904).

A director is not entitled to compensation for services rendered as secretary to the promoters prior to the organization of the corporation, in the absence of any understanding looking to any such compensation. West Point Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Rose, 76 Miss. 61, 23 So. 629, 1898 Miss. LEXIS 65 (Miss. 1898).

A private corporation, through its officers or agents, may incur liability for a reward offered for the arrest of persons unlawfully interfering with its property or business. Norwood & Butterfield Co. v. Andrews, 71 Miss. 641, 16 So. 262, 1893 Miss. LEXIS 89 (Miss. 1893).

The owner and operator of an incorporated sole proprietorship was personally liable, under § 79-3-285 [Repealed], for corporate debts to a creditor who dealt with the corporation as a sole proprietorship which were incurred while the corporation was suspended from doing business, pursuant to § 79-3-189 [Repealed], for failing to file an annual report. Carolina Transformer Co. v. Anderson, 341 So. 2d 1327, 1977 Miss. LEXIS 2303 (Miss. 1977).

Power of corporation or its officers with respect to payment of remuneration, bonus, and the like, to widow or family of deceased officer. 29 A.L.R.2d 1262.

Authority of corporate officers to mortgage or pledge corporate personal property.
62 A.L.R.2d 712.

Discovery and inspection: compelling party to disclose information in hands of affiliated or subsidiary corporation, or independent contractor, not made party to suit. 19 A.L.R.3d 1134.

Criminal liability of corporation for extortion, false pretenses or similar offenses. 49 A.L.R.3d 820.

What constitutes waiver of stockholder’s or corporation’s right to enforce first-option stock purchase agreement.
55 A.L.R.3d 723.

Corporation’s criminal liability for homicide. 45 A.L.R.4th 1021.

The law looks with disfavor upon the defense of ultra vires, and holds that the doctrine should not be allowed to prevail where it would defeat the ends of justice, or work a legal wrong. Pendleton v. Williams, 198 So. 2d 235, 1967 Miss. LEXIS 1255 (Miss. 1967).

Estoppel of stockholder to recover back or to secure restoration of compensation of corporate officers claimed to be exorbitant or unauthorized.
16 A.L.R.2d 467.

Power of particular officer or agent of business corporation to bind it by a donation to a charity or similar institution.
50 A.L.R.2d 447.

Authority of corporate officers to mortgage or pledge corporate personal property.
62 A.L.R.2d 712.

Liability of corporate officer or director for commission or compensation received from third person in connection with that person’s transaction with corporation.
47 A.L.R.3d 373.

Availability of sole shareholder’s Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination to resist production of corporation’s books and records-modern status.
87 A.L.R. Fed. 177.